New Jersey, session 222, A5069.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The New Jersey Transit Corporation shall adopt a written nondiscrimination policy that complies with federal and State laws and regulations prohibiting unlawful employment discrimination and harassment, including, but not limited to, the Law Against Discrimination, P.L.1945, c.169 (C.10:5-1 et seq.). b.    The corporation shall distribute the nondiscrimination policy adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section to each employee of the corporation who is employed by the corporation on the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) within 60 calendar days of the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). The corporation shall distribute the nondiscrimination policy to each employee of the corporation who commences employment with the corporation after the effective date of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) within five business days of the employee commencing employment with the corporation. Each employee of the corporation shall acknowledge receipt of the nondiscrimination policy in writing within 10 business days following receipt of the nondiscrimination policy and such written receipt shall be retained by the director of the corporations human resources office.  The corporation shall make the written nondiscrimination policy available to each employee of the corporation upon request. c.     The corporation shall require each employee of the corporation to complete training on the written nondiscrimination policy adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section at least once per calendar year. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.